Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2843.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 30, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding chapter 9, to read: CHAPTER 9 SOLAR ENERGY ARTICLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS START_STATUTE30-1101. Portable solar generation devices; requirements; liability; definition A. A public power entity may not require a customer that uses a portable solar generation device to: 1. Obtain approval before installing or using the portable solar generation device. 2. Pay a fee or charge. 3. Install additional controls or equipment beyond what is integrated into the system. B. A portable solar generation device that is offered for sale and sold in this state shall: 1. Be listed and labeled in accordance with a national safety standard that is approved by the corporation commission. 2. Include integrated means that stop energizing the building circuit on loss of utility power and that are consistent with the institute of electrical and electronics engineers standards. 3. Comply with the manufacturer's installation instructions and the national electrical code provisions that apply to cord-and-plug connected equipment. C. A public power entity is not liable for damages in any civil action for any injury or death due to a customer's operation of a portable solar generation device if an electric utility disconnects power. D. Notwithstanding sections 9-801, 9-802, 9-803 and 11-861, a city, town or county may not require a permit, an inspection or any additional local approval for a portable solar generation device or prohibit or restrict the use of a portable solar generation device that complies with subsection B of this section. E. For the purposes of this section, "Portable solar generation device": 1. Means a moveable photovoltaic generation device that: (a) Has a maximum power output of not more than 1,200 watts. (b) Is designed to be connected to a building's electrical system through a STANDARD 120 volt alternating current outlet. (c) Is intended primarily to offset part of the customer's electricity consumption. (d) Meets the standards of the most recent version of the national electrical code. (e) Is certified by a nationally recognized testing laboratory. 2. Does not include a generating facility, distributed generation facility or net metering facility.END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 40, chapter 2, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 40-207, to read: START_STATUTE40-207. Portable solar generation devices; requirements; liability; definition A. A public service corporation may not require a customer that uses a portable solar generation device to: 1. Obtain approval before installing or using the portable solar generation device. 2. Pay a fee or charge. 3. Install any additional controls or equipment beyond what is integrated into the system. B. A portable solar generation device that is offered for sale and sold in this state shall: 1. Be listed and labeled in accordance with a national safety standard that is approved by the corporation commission. 2. Include integrated means that stop energizing the building circuit on loss of utility power and that are consistent with the institute of electrical and electronics engineers standards. 3. Comply with the manufacturer's installation instructions and the national electrical code provisions that apply to cord-and-plug connected equipment. C. A public service corporation is not liable for damages in any civil action for any injury or death due to a customer's operation of a portable solar generation device if an electric utility disconnects power. D. Notwithstanding sections 9-801, 9-802, 9-803 and 11-861, a city, town or county may not require a permit, an inspection or any additional local approval for a portable solar generation device or prohibit or restrict the use of a portable solar generation device that complies with subsection B of this section. E. For the purposes of this section, "Portable solar generation device": 1. Means a moveable photovoltaic generation device that: (a) Has a maximum power output of not more than one thousand two hundred watts. (b) Is designed to be connected to a building's electrical system through a STANDARD one hundred twenty volt alternating current outlet. (c) Is intended primarily to offset part of the customer's electricity consumption. (d) Meets the standards of the most recent version of the national electrical code. (e) Is certified by a nationally recognized testing laboratory. 2. Does not include a generating facility, distributed generation facility or net metering facility.END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 44-1761, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE44-1761. Definitions In this article, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Collector" means a component of a solar energy device that is used to absorb solar radiation, convert it to heat or electricity and transfer the heat to a heat transfer fluid or to storage. 2. "Distributed energy generation system": (a) Means a device or system that is used to generate or store electricity, that has an electric delivery capacity, singly or in connection with other similar devices or systems, greater than one kilowatt or one kilowatt-hour, and that is primarily for on-site energy consumption. (b) Does not include either: (i) An electric generator that is intended for occasional use. (ii) A portable solar generation device as defined in sections 30-1101 and 40-207. 3. "Energize" or "energized" means that the distributed energy generation system is installed and operational for its intended purposes of generating or storing electricity. 4. "Heat exchanger" means a component of a solar energy device that is used to transfer heat from one fluid to another. 5. "Interconnected" or "interconnection" means a distributed energy generation system that is connected to the power grid and that is able to transfer electricity to the power grid. 6. "Seller or marketer" means an individual or a company acting through its officers, employees or agents that markets, sells or solicits the sale, financing or lease of distributed energy generation systems or negotiates or enters into agreements for the sale, financing or lease of distributed energy generation systems. 7. "Solar daylighting" means a device that is specifically designed to capture and redirect the visible portion of the solar beam spectrum, while controlling the infrared portion, for use in illuminating interior building spaces in lieu of artificial lighting. 8. "Solar energy device": (a) Means a system or series of mechanisms that is designed primarily to provide heating, to provide cooling, to produce electrical power, to produce mechanical power, to provide solar daylighting or to provide any combination of the foregoing by means of collecting and transferring solar generated energy into such uses either by active or passive means. Such systems may also have the capability of storing such energy for future utilization. Passive systems shall clearly be designed as a solar energy device such as a trombe wall and not merely a part of a normal structure such as a window. (b) Includes a distributed energy generation system.END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Title 44, chapter 11, article 11, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 44-1765, to read: START_STATUTE44-1765. Portable solar generation device A portable solar generation device as defined in sections 30-1101 and 40-207 shall include a device or feature that prevents the system from energizing the building's electrical system during a power outage.END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Corporation commission; rules Within one year after the effective date of this act, the corporation commission shall adopt rules that comply with title 30, chapter 9, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, and section 40-207, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act.